Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.195

Sudden cardiac arrest in youth athletes—Online pamphlet—Online prevention program for coaches.

(1) The Washington interscholastic activities association shall work with member schools' board of directors, a nonprofit organization that educates communities about sudden cardiac arrest in youth athletes, and the University of Washington medicine center for sports cardiology to develop and make available an online pamphlet that provides youth athletes, their parents or guardians, and coaches with information about sudden cardiac arrest. The online pamphlet must include information on the nature, risk, symptoms and warning signs, prevention, and treatment of sudden cardiac arrest. The online pamphlet shall be posted on the office of the superintendent of public instruction's website.

(2) The Washington interscholastic activities association shall work with member schools' board of directors, an organization that provides educational training for safe participation in athletic activity, and the University of Washington medicine center for sports cardiology to make available an existing online sudden cardiac arrest prevention program for coaches.

(3) On a yearly basis, prior to participating in an interscholastic athletic activity a sudden cardiac arrest form stating that the online pamphlet was reviewed shall be signed by the youth athlete and the athlete's parents and/or guardian and returned to the school.

(4) Every three years, prior to coaching an interscholastic athletic activity coaches shall complete the online sudden cardiac arrest prevention program described in this section. Coaches shall provide a certificate showing completion of the online sudden cardiac arrest prevention program to the school.

[ 2015 c 26 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2015 c 26: "The legislature finds that sudden cardiac death is the result of an unexpected failure of proper heart function that may occur during or immediately after exercise. The legislature further finds that it has been reported that cardiac arrest is the leading cause of death in young athletes. The legislature finds that approximately one in two hundred fifty young athletes has a heart disorder that may increase his or her risk of sudden cardiac arrest. The legislature intends to make youth athletes, their families, and coaches aware of sudden cardiac arrest." [ 2015 c 26 s 1.]

Short title—2015 c 26: "This act may be known and cited as the sudden cardiac arrest awareness act." [ 2015 c 26 s 4.]